Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 SECURITY APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin JUDICIARY APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article and are added to or, if shown in parentheses, are subtracted from the appropriations in Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 1, and Laws 2025, chapter 39, article 1. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SUPREME COURTnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 6,062,000 new text end new text begin (a) Security for Judicial Officials new text end new text begin $64,000 the second year is for security for judicial officials. The base for this appropriation is $35,000 beginning in fiscal year 2028. new text end new text begin (b) Judicial Security Unit new text end new text begin $312,000 the second year is for additional security personnel. new text end new text begin (c) Security Threat Response new text end new text begin $1,686,000 the second year is for response to threats to the security and stability of the judiciary. The chief justice is authorized to transfer funds to the court of appeals and the district courts for this purpose. The base for this appropriation is $305,000 beginning in fiscal year 2028. new text end new text begin (d) Safe and Secure Courthouse Initiative new text end new text begin $4,000,000 the second year is for a competitive grant program for courthouse safety and security improvements. Grants may be awarded to governmental entities to fund courthouse security assessments, equipment, technology, construction, or training needs. Grant recipients must provide a 50 percent nonstate match. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin COURT OF APPEALSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 60,000 new text end new text begin Safety and Security new text end new text begin $60,000 the second year is to implement safety and security measures. The base for this appropriation is $33,000 beginning in fiscal year 2028. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin DISTRICT COURTSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 843,000 new text end new text begin Safety and Security new text end new text begin $843,000 the second year is to implement safety and security measures. The base for this appropriation is $467,000 beginning in fiscal year 2028. new text end Sec. 5. Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 1, section 2, is amended to read: Sec. 2. SUPREME COURT $ 54,597,000 $ 50,597,000 (a) Contingent Account $5,000 each year is for a contingent account for expenses necessary for the normal operation of the court for which no other reimbursement is provided. (b) Justice Partner Access $4,000,000 the first year is to improve justice partner access to documents and court information. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. (c) Base Adjustment The general fund base shall be deleted text begin $50,821,000deleted text end new text begin $51,636,000new text end beginning in fiscal year 2028. Sec. 6. Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 1, section 4, is amended to read: Sec. 4. COURT OF APPEALS $ 15,624,000 $ 15,624,000 Base Adjustment The general fund base shall be deleted text begin $15,794,000deleted text end new text begin $15,871,000new text end beginning in fiscal year 2028. Sec. 7. Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 1, section 5, is amended to read: Sec. 5. DISTRICT COURTS $ 396,395,000 $ 396,396,000 (a) Forensic Examiner Rate Increase $2,685,000 each year is to increase the hourly rate paid to forensic examiners. (b) Base Adjustment The general fund base shall be deleted text begin $403,810,000deleted text end new text begin $402,918,000new text end beginning in fiscal year 2028. Sec. 8. Laws 2025, chapter 39, article 1, section 2, is amended to read: Sec. 2. LEGISLATURE Subdivision 1. Total Appropriation $ deleted text begin 112,970,000 deleted text end new text begin 115,077,000 new text end $ deleted text begin 114,534,000 deleted text end new text begin 115,975,000 new text end The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. The base for this appropriation is deleted text begin $112,818,000deleted text end new text begin $114,568,000new text end in fiscal year 2028 new text begin and $114,598,000 in fiscal year 2029 new text end and each fiscal year thereafter. Subd. 2. Senate deleted text begin 38,238,000 deleted text end new text begin 39,407,000 new text end deleted text begin 39,690,000 deleted text end new text begin 40,689,000 new text end new text begin The base for this appropriation is $40,729,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $40,759,000 in fiscal year 2029 and each fiscal year thereafter. new text end Subd. 3. House of Representatives deleted text begin 42,375,000 deleted text end new text begin 43,313,000 new text end deleted text begin 41,163,000 deleted text end new text begin 41,605,000 new text end The base for this appropriation is deleted text begin $39,437,000deleted text end new text begin $40,148,000new text end in fiscal year 2028 new text begin and $40,148,000 in fiscal year 2029 new text end and each fiscal year thereafter. Subd. 4. Legislative Coordinating Commission 32,357,000 33,681,000 The base for this appropriation is $33,691,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter. Legislative Auditor. $12,365,000 the first year and $12,857,000 the second year are for the Office of the Legislative Auditor. The base for this appropriation is $12,867,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter. Revisor of Statutes. $9,094,000 the first year and $9,466,000 the second year are for the Office of the Revisor of Statutes. Legislative Reference Library. $2,278,000 the first year and $2,369,000 the second year are for the Legislative Reference Library. Legislative Budget Office. $2,800,000 the first year and $2,965,000 the second year are for the Legislative Budget Office. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 9. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 4, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. State Patrol (a) Patrolling Highways 147,013,000 148,960,000 Appropriations by Fund 2026 2027 General 37,000 37,000 H.U.T.D. 92,000 92,000 Trunk Highway 146,884,000 148,831,000 $1,045,000 in each year is from the trunk highway fund for recruitment and hiring initiatives. Of the base from the trunk highway fund, $10,365,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029 is for this purpose, which includes funding to conduct an additional annual trooper academy. The base from the trunk highway fund is $158,151,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029. (b) Commercial Vehicle Enforcement 18,861,000 18,861,000 (c) Capitol Security deleted text begin 19,243,000 deleted text end new text begin 25,119,000 new text end deleted text begin 19,243,000 deleted text end new text begin 29,142,000 new text end This appropriation is from the general fund. new text begin The base for this appropriation is $25,779,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $24,849,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin $2,220,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $5,099,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for staffing, overtime, and equipping costs of additional State Patrol personnel and associated scanning equipment, to perform screening of individuals entering the State Capitol building. The base for this purpose is $3,510,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $2,879,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin $4,700,000 in fiscal year 2027 is for security enhancements on the Capitol complex, including but not limited to staffing, equipment, and operations. The base for this purpose is $1,560,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $1,561,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin $1,736,000 in fiscal year 2026 is for the legislative services unit under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10. The base for this purpose is $1,466,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $1,166,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 is for the Security Services Task Force under article 2, section 11. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end The commissioner must not: (1) spend any money from the trunk highway fund for capitol security; or (2) permanently transfer any state trooper from the patrolling highways activity to capitol security. The commissioner must not transfer any money appropriated to the commissioner under this section: (1) to capitol security; or (2) from capitol security. (d) Vehicle Crimes Unit 1,290,000 1,303,000 This appropriation is from the highway user tax distribution fund to investigate: (1) registration tax and motor vehicle sales tax liabilities from individuals and businesses that currently do not pay all taxes owed; and (2) illegal or improper activity related to the sale, transfer, titling, and registration of motor vehicles. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; LEGISLATURE; LEGISLATIVE SECURITY SERVICES REIMBURSEMENTS.new text end new text begin (a) $1,467,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the senate to make reimbursements under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10, subdivision 3, paragraph (g). This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) $2,933,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the house of representatives to make reimbursements under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10, subdivision 3, paragraph (g). This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; CONSTITUTIONAL OFFICERS; SAFETY AND SECURITY.new text end new text begin (a) $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the attorney general for the safety and security of the attorney general. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the secretary of state for the safety and security of the secretary of state. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (c) $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the state auditor for the safety and security of the state auditor. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin APPROPRIATION; BUREAU OF CRIMINAL APPREHENSION.new text end new text begin $1,012,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for Bureau of Criminal Apprehension staffing and operating costs related to threat assessment and investigation activities, including in coordination with the legislative services unit under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin TRANSFER; DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES.new text end new text begin Upon request from the commissioner of natural resources, the commissioner of management and budget may transfer up to $1,600,000 in fiscal year 2026 from any Department of Natural Resources fiscal year 2024 or fiscal year 2025 general fund nongrant operating appropriations that were carried forward to fiscal year 2026 to the Division of Enforcement. This transfer may only be used for nonbudgeted public safety costs that occurred in fiscal year 2026. By September 15, 2026, the commissioner of natural resources must report the amount and source of the transfer authorized under this section to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 2 CAPITOL SECURITY POLICY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.6905, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 39. new text end new text begin Emergency contact information data. new text end new text begin Data related to emergency contacts for elected officials are governed by section 299A.96. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [299A.96] EMERGENCY CONTACT INFORMATION FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin (c) "Elected official" means a state executive officer, member of the legislature, justice of the supreme court, or member of the state's federal congressional delegation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Submitting contact information to commissioner. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of subdivision 4 and subject to paragraph (c), an elected official must submit and verify annually by January 31 to the commissioner the following information in the form prescribed by the commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) primary residential address; new text end new text begin (2) any secondary address in the state; new text end new text begin (3) work telephone number; new text end new text begin (4) home telephone number; new text end new text begin (5) email address; and new text end new text begin (6) list and contact information of immediate family members. new text end new text begin (b) An elected official must notify the commissioner within 30 days after changing any information under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) An elected official may opt out of the requirements under this subdivision by submitting a notification in writing to the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Data classification. new text end new text begin All information submitted under subdivision 2 is classified as private data on individuals under section 13.02, subdivision 12. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Using and disclosing information. new text end new text begin (a) The data under subdivision 2 may only be accessed by authorized personnel for official public safety purposes in the course of use or disclosure as provided under this subdivision. The commissioner may use or disclose data under subdivision 2 only to ensure the safety and security of elected officials or their immediate family members. new text end new text begin (b) Use or disclosure of the data under subdivision 2 is subject to the remedies and penalties under sections 13.08 and 13.09. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299D.03, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Members, powers, and duties. (a) The commissioner is hereby authorized to employ and designate a chief supervisor, a chief assistant supervisor, and such assistant supervisors, sergeants and officers as are provided by law, who deleted text begin shalldeleted text end comprise the Minnesota State Patrol. (b) deleted text begin Thedeleted text end Members of the Minnesota State Patrol deleted text begin shalldeleted text end have the power and authority: (1) as peace officers to enforce the provisions of the law relating to the protection of and use of trunk highways; (2) at all times to direct all traffic on trunk highways in conformance with law, and in the event of a fire or other emergency, or to expedite traffic or to insure safety, to direct traffic on other roads as conditions may require notwithstanding the provisions of law; (3) to serve search warrants related to criminal motor vehicle and traffic violations and arrest warrants, and legal documents anywhere in the state; (4) to serve orders of the commissioner of public safety or the commissioner's duly authorized agents issued under the provisions of the Driver's License Law, the Safety Responsibility Act, or relating to authorized brake- and light-testing stations, anywhere in the state and to take possession of any license, permit, or certificate ordered to be surrendered; (5) to inspect official brake and light adjusting stations; (6) to make appearances anywhere within the state for the purpose of conducting traffic safety educational programs and school bus clinics; (7) to exercise upon all trunk highways the same powers with respect to the enforcement of laws relating to crimes, as sheriffs and police officers; (8) to cooperate, under instructions and rules of the commissioner of public safety, with all sheriffs and other police officers anywhere in the state, provided that said employees deleted text begin shalldeleted text end have no power or authority in connection with strikes or industrial disputes; (9) to assist and aid any peace officer whose life or safety is in jeopardy; (10) as peace officers to provide security and protectionnew text begin : (i)new text end to the governor, governor elect, either or both houses of the legislature, and state buildings or property in the manner and to the extent determined to be necessary after consultation with the governor, or a designeenew text begin ; and (ii) as provided in section 299E.10new text end . Pursuant to this clause, members of the State Patrol, acting as peace officers have the same powers with respect to the enforcement of laws relating to crimes, as sheriffs and police officers have within their respective jurisdictions; (11) to inspect school buses anywhere in the state for the purposes of determining compliance with vehicle equipment, pollution control, and registration requirements; (12) as peace officers to make arrests for public offenses committed in their presence anywhere within the state. Persons arrested for violations other than traffic violations deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be referred deleted text begin forthwithdeleted text end new text begin immediatelynew text end to the appropriate local law enforcement agency for further investigation or disposition; and (13) to enforce the North American uniform out-of-service criteria and issue out-of-service orders, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, section 383.5. (c) After consultation with the governor or a designee, the commissioner may require the State Patrol to provide security and protection to supreme court justices, legislators, and constitutional officers other than the governor, for a limited period and within the limits of existing resources, in response to a credible threat on the individual's life or safety. (d) The state may contract for State Patrol members to render the services described in this section in excess of their regularly scheduled duty hours and patrol members rendering such services deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be compensated in such amounts, manner and under such conditions as the agreement provides. (e) Employees thus employed and designated deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end subscribe an oath. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [299E.005] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin For purposes of this chapter, the terms defined in this section have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Capitol Area. new text end new text begin "Capitol Area" has the meaning given in section 15B.02. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Commissioner. new text end new text begin "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299E.01, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Created; director. A deleted text begin divisiondeleted text end new text begin sectionnew text end in the Department of Public Safety to be known as deleted text begin thedeleted text end Capitol deleted text begin Complexdeleted text end Security deleted text begin Divisiondeleted text end new text begin is created within the State Patrol. Capitol Securitynew text end is under the supervision and control of the director of Capitol deleted text begin complexdeleted text end security, who must be a member of the State Patrol and to whom are assigned the duties and responsibilities described in this section. The commissionernew text begin of public safetynew text end may place the director's position in the unclassified service if the position meets the criteria of section 43A.08, subdivision 1a. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299E.01, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Responsibilities. (a) deleted text begin The divisiondeleted text end new text begin Capitol Securitynew text end is responsible and must utilize state employees fornew text begin : (1)new text end security and public information services in state-owned buildings and state leased-to-own buildings in the Capitol Area, as described in section 15B.02new text begin ; and (2) legislative services as provided under section 299E.10new text end . deleted text begin Itdeleted text end new text begin The commissionernew text end must provide personnel as are required by the circumstances to deleted text begin insuredeleted text end new text begin ensurenew text end the orderly conduct of state business and the convenience of the public. Until July 1, 2026, it must provide emergency assistance and security escorts at any location within the Capitol Area, as described in section 15B.02, when requested by a state constitutional officer. (b) As part of deleted text begin the divisiondeleted text end new text begin Capitol Securitynew text end permanent staff, the directornew text begin of Capitol Securitynew text end must establish the position of emergency manager that includes, at a minimum, the following duties: (1) oversight of the consolidation, development, and maintenance of plans and procedures that provide continuity of security operations; (2) the development and implementation of tenant training that addresses threats and emergency procedures; and (3) the development and implementation of threat and emergency exercises. (c) The director must provide a minimum of one state trooper assigned to the Capitol complex at all times.new text begin The director and any state troopers assigned to the Capitol complex must have current training in, or recent experience conducting, criminal investigations that include identifying witnesses and report writing.new text end new text begin (d) Subject to available resources, the director must provide for a staffing complement and reimbursements to meet the requirements under section 299E.10. new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The director, in consultation with the advisory committee under section 299E.04, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end , at least annually, hold a meeting or meetings to discuss, among other issues, Capitol complex security, emergency planning, public safety, and public access to the Capitol complex. The meetings must include, at a minimum: (1) Capitol complex tenants and state employees; (2) nongovernmental entities, such as lobbyists, vendors, and the media; and (3) the public and public advocacy groups. new text begin (f) Notwithstanding arrest referral requirements in section 299D.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clause (12), Capitol Security is the lead agency responsible for investigating alleged criminal offenses that occur in state-owned buildings and state leased-to-own buildings, or on grounds surrounding these buildings, within the Capitol Area. Another law enforcement agency may assume responsibility for a criminal investigation under this paragraph if the director and the chief law enforcement officer for the other agency agree, in writing, to transfer responsibility for the investigation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299E.01, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Powers and duties transferred. All powers, duties and responsibilities heretofore assigned by law to the commissioner of administration relating to the general function of security in Capitol complex state-owned buildings are hereby transferred to the commissioner of public safety. The commissioner of public safety deleted text begin shall havedeleted text end new text begin hasnew text end the final authority regarding public safety and security in the Capitol complex. The commissioner of administration deleted text begin shall havedeleted text end new text begin hasnew text end the powers, duties, and responsibilities relating to the Capitol complex of state-owned buildings as provided under chapter 16B. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299E.01, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Capitol complex. For purposes of this section, the Capitol complex of state-owned buildings deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end as defined in chapter 15B, and acts amendatory thereof and such other state-owned or state-leased buildings and property within the Twin Cities metropolitan area as the governor from time to time may designate. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [299E.015] CAPITOL COMPLEX SECURITY; REPORTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Public report. new text end new text begin (a) By January 15 of each year beginning in calendar year 2028, the commissioner must submit a report on the legislative services unit and security in the Capitol Area to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state government, public safety, and transportation and to the Advisory Committee on Capitol Area Security. new text end new text begin (b) At a minimum, the report must: new text end new text begin (1) provide sufficient information to support a public conversation on Capitol complex security while maintaining the integrity of the state's security posture; new text end new text begin (2) provide an overview of the activities of Capitol Security and the legislative services unit; new text end new text begin (3) review the performance of the legislative services unit in each of the duties specified under section 299E.10, subdivisions 3 and 4; new text end new text begin (4) provide summary data for the prior year on the number of: new text end new text begin (i) threat assessments performed; new text end new text begin (ii) credible threats identified, disaggregated by the type and nature of the threat; new text end new text begin (iii) personal security and protection instances performed following a request or based on a threat assessment; and new text end new text begin (iv) changes from the preceding year in the amounts under items (i) to (iii); new text end new text begin (5) subject to the limitations of paragraph (d), describe how money appropriated for Capitol complex security was used in the previous year; new text end new text begin (6) subject to the limits of paragraph (d), provide a detailed description of security services costs, disaggregated by type of activity and any reimbursements; and new text end new text begin (7) provide any recommendations for relevant efficiency improvements, cost saving measures, and changes in security practices or state law. new text end new text begin (c) The public report may include summary data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 19, and may include the executive summary of the report required under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (d) The report prepared under this subdivision must not contain descriptions of identified security vulnerabilities; public and controlled access systems and pathways; staffing patterns; architectural constraints; camera, alarm, and records technology systems; or any other information of which the disclosure would be likely to jeopardize the security of the Capitol Area buildings and the individuals who work in and visit those spaces. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Not public report. new text end new text begin (a) By January 15 of each year, the commissioner of public safety must report on the legislative services unit and security in the Capitol Area to the Advisory Committee on Capitol Area Security, the senate majority leader, the senate minority leader, the speaker of the house, and the minority leader of the house of representatives or, if there is no minority leader, the leader of the caucus that is not represented by the speaker of the house. At a minimum, the report must: new text end new text begin (1) describe how money appropriated for Capitol complex security was used in the previous year; new text end new text begin (2) provide a detailed description of security services costs, disaggregated by type of activity and any reimbursements; new text end new text begin (3) provide summary data for the legislative services unit in the previous year on the number of personal security and protection requests made and the number of personal security and protection instances performed following a request or based on a threat assessment; new text end new text begin (4) provide information on security incidents that occurred in the previous year, including incident categorization and trends compared to prior years; new text end new text begin (5) summarize the status of security staffing, use of technology, training, and other security procedures; new text end new text begin (6) describe any identified security vulnerabilities and propose steps to eliminate or mitigate those vulnerabilities; and new text end new text begin (7) make recommendations for changes in security policy and levels of funding. new text end new text begin (b) The report prepared under this subdivision is security information as defined in section 13.37, subdivision 1, paragraph (a). The report under this subdivision is not subject to the requirements under section 3.195. new text end new text begin (c) Upon request in writing by a recipient of the report under paragraph (a), the commissioner must provide additional details on security incidents. new text end new text begin (d) A member who receives a report prepared under this subdivision or information under paragraph (c) must not disseminate the report or information to the public. A member who willfully discloses the report or information in violation of this paragraph is subject to the penalties under section 13.09. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [299E.10] LEGISLATIVE SERVICES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Unit created. new text end new text begin A legislative services unit is established within Capitol Security to perform the duties specified in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Staffing. new text end new text begin The legislative services unit must be under the supervision and control of a member of the State Patrol who is a peace officer. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Threat assessment, mitigation, and response. new text end new text begin (a) The legislative services unit must (1) identify, assess, and investigate threats to the life or safety of a member of the legislature, and (2) assist in mitigation of threats that the unit determines are credible. The credible threat mitigation responsibilities of the unit include but are not limited to coordination with the State Patrol, local law enforcement, the relevant sergeant-at-arms of the senate or house of representatives, and other available resources on a security response to threats, including provision of personal security and protection for the member when warranted by a threat. new text end new text begin (b) Unless there are exigent circumstances or information that indicates otherwise, the unit must prioritize assessment of threats against members of the legislature in the following order: new text end new text begin (1) threats that involved a request for an emergency services response; new text end new text begin (2) threats that are referred for assessment by the speaker of the house, the minority leader of the house, or the majority or minority leader of the senate; new text end new text begin (3) threats that are specifically referred for assessment by any other member of the legislature; and new text end new text begin (4) threats that are identified by the unit, referred by a member of the legislature where a threat assessment is not requested, and gathered from any other source. new text end new text begin (c) For an imminent credible threat, the commissioner must immediately coordinate a response by available law enforcement resources. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner may consult with the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension to determine whether a threat is credible. new text end new text begin (e) In response to a request under paragraph (b), clause (2) or (3), the commissioner must as soon as practicable provide the subject of a threat, and when appropriate and authorized by law, any referring party, with: new text end new text begin (1) an initial estimate on how long the requested threat assessment will take to complete; new text end new text begin (2) an explanation of the unit's threat analysis and determination; new text end new text begin (3) recommendations for mitigating the threat; and new text end new text begin (4) the proposed and intended actions of the unit to implement the recommendations under clause (3). new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner is not required to perform threat mitigation actions identified under paragraph (e) that are declined by the subject of the threat. new text end new text begin (g) The house of representatives and the senate, as appropriate, must reimburse the Department of Public Safety or a law enforcement agency for the reasonable costs of personal security and protection incurred under this subdivision. The house of representatives and the senate may enter into agreements with the commissioner to implement the requirements under this paragraph and subdivision 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Responsibilities. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "security services" includes but is not limited to security activities; protective activities; identification and assessment of public safety vulnerabilities, risks, and threats; and emergency response. new text end new text begin (b) Subject to available resources, the legislative services unit must: new text end new text begin (1) coordinate security services provided to members of the legislature, including but not limited to activities as a centralized communications and coordination hub and a liaison between members of the legislature, the sergeants-at-arms of the senate and house of representatives, the Minnesota Fusion Center, and local law enforcement agencies; new text end new text begin (2) develop and maintain a plan on security services provided to members of the legislature, which must include but is not limited to a threat matrix protocol for members of the legislature, for statewide use by the state and political subdivisions; new text end new text begin (3) develop protocols or procedures for security services communications related to or conducted with members of the legislature; new text end new text begin (4) develop protocols or procedures to identify, collate, assess, and respond to a credible threat to life or safety of a member of the legislature; new text end new text begin (5) upon request of a member of the legislature, review and provide input on plans by political subdivisions and local law enforcement agencies for security services provided to members of the legislature; new text end new text begin (6) offer to provide security orientation and training for newly elected members of the legislature within 21 days of taking the oath of office; and new text end new text begin (7) perform other activities determined to be necessary and related to the responsibilities specified in this subdivision, after consultation with the commissioner and the governor. new text end new text begin (c) The duties of the legislative services unit do not include individualized personal protective activities or emergency response outside the Capitol complex, except as provided under this section or section 299D.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner may provide security and protection under this section in the form and manner the commissioner deems necessary. new text end new text begin (e) The protocols and procedures under paragraph (b) must follow generally accepted practices for security activities information gathering and evaluation and must safeguard the due process rights, civil liberties, and privacy rights of individuals. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Agreements with local law enforcement; reimbursement. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may enter into an agreement or similar arrangement with a local law enforcement agency for assistance by local peace officers to meet the security activities requirements under this section or section 299D.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The following are available for reimbursement to a local law enforcement agency for eligible costs of assistance: new text end new text begin (1) an appropriation to the commissioner for the legislative services unit or the State Patrol, other than from the trunk highway fund or highway user tax distribution fund; and new text end new text begin (2) money received under subdivision 3, paragraph (g). new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must establish a reimbursement process that minimizes submission and implementation burdens. Eligible costs for reimbursement must include but are not limited to time and overtime of personnel, travel expenses, equipment use, and other documented direct costs determined by the commissioner as necessary and reasonable. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin SECURITY SERVICES TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin (c) "Security services" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10, subdivision 4, paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (d) "Task force" means the Security Services Task Force established in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Security Services Task Force is established to advise and provide recommendations on security and protective services provided to members of the legislature. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The task force is composed of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) two members of the senate, with one appointed by the senate majority leader and one appointed by the senate minority leader; new text end new text begin (2) two members of the house of representatives, with one appointed by the leader of each primary caucus in the house of representatives; new text end new text begin (3) the commissioner or a designee; new text end new text begin (4) one representative from the Minnesota Fusion Center, appointed by the commissioner; new text end new text begin (5) the chief supervisor of the State Patrol or a designee; new text end new text begin (6) the director of Capitol Security or a designee; new text end new text begin (7) one representative or an appointee from the supreme court, appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court; new text end new text begin (8) one representative for state constitutional officers, jointly appointed by the attorney general, secretary of state, and state auditor; new text end new text begin (9) one representative from the Minnesota Sheriffs' Association, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors; new text end new text begin (10) one representative from the Minnesota Chiefs of Police Association, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors; new text end new text begin (11) the sergeants-at-arms of the senate or a designee; and new text end new text begin (12) the sergeants-at-arms of the house of representatives or a designee. new text end new text begin (b) By August 15, 2026, the appointing authorities under paragraph (a) must make the appointments and designations. new text end new text begin (c) Members of the task force serve at the pleasure of the appropriate appointing authority. new text end new text begin (d) At its first meeting, the task force must elect a chair or cochairs from among the task force members specified in paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (3), by a majority vote of those members present and may elect a vice-chair as necessary. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Meetings. new text end new text begin (a) By September 15, 2026, the commissioner must convene the first meeting of the task force. new text end new text begin (b) The task force must meet as necessary to accomplish the duties under subdivision 5. new text end new text begin (c) The task force is subject to the Open Meeting Law under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D, including but not limited to the authority provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 13D.05, subdivision 3, paragraph (d). new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must: new text end new text begin (1) review and analyze national best practices on security services for public officials; new text end new text begin (2) advise the commissioner on implementation of the legislative services unit under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10, including but not limited to providing input on (i) unit duties, and (ii) mutual aid and reimbursement processes under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10, subdivisions 3 and 5; new text end new text begin (3) assist the commissioner in the development of protocols for communication and coordination of security services for members of the legislature, including but not limited to providing a recommendation of approval or disapproval of the protocols; new text end new text begin (4) analyze effectiveness, deficiencies, costs, data privacy, and potential enhancements of information technology systems used for security services communications related to members of the legislature; new text end new text begin (5) evaluate methods to provide security services to the house of representatives and senate or a legislative proceeding or event, and to provide individualized personal protective services for a member of the legislature; new text end new text begin (6) advise the commissioner in the development of procedures and requirements for security orientation and training for new members of the legislature; new text end new text begin (7) evaluate methods to ensure personal data privacy related to personal security needs of members of the legislature; new text end new text begin (8) perform other activities as determined to be necessary and related to the duties specified in this subdivision; and new text end new text begin (9) develop recommendations related to the duties specified in this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) The task force may only adopt a finding or recommendation following a vote of at least four of the task force members specified in subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (3). new text end new text begin (c) The task force must adopt a finding or recommendation that receives an affirmative vote from all four of the task force members specified in subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (2). new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must provide administrative and staff support for the task force. new text end new text begin (b) Upon request of the task force, the commissioner and local units of government must provide information and technical assistance in a timely fashion. new text end new text begin (c) Members of the task force serve without compensation under this section. Legislative members may receive per diem and reimbursement for expenses as provided in the rules of their respective bodies. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By February 1, 2027, the commissioner and the task force must jointly submit a report on the task force to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state government, public safety, and transportation and to the Advisory Committee on Capitol Area Security. At a minimum, the report must: new text end new text begin (1) summarize the activities of the task force, including for each of the duties specified under subdivision 5; new text end new text begin (2) identify task force findings and recommendations and any resulting actions by the commissioner; new text end new text begin (3) provide a status update on implementation of the legislative services unit under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10; new text end new text begin (4) if available, provide a draft of the plan specified under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10, subdivision 4, paragraph (b), clause (2); and new text end new text begin (5) make recommendations on any relevant changes in state law, including proposed legislation. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires on June 30, 2027. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin LEGISLATIVE SERVICES UNIT IMPLEMENTATION.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety must immediately commence implementation of the legislative services unit under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10. new text end new text begin (b) By December 15, 2027, the commissioner of public safety must submit a report on the legislative services unit to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state government, public safety, and transportation and to the Advisory Committee on Capitol Area Security. At a minimum, the report must: new text end new text begin (1) provide a status update on implementation of the legislative services unit under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10; new text end new text begin (2) summarize the activities of the legislative services unit for each of the responsibilities specified under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10, subdivisions 3 and 4; new text end new text begin (3) if available, provide the plan specified under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10, subdivision 4, paragraph (b), clause (2); new text end new text begin (4) identify any actions taken by the commissioner in response to recommendations of the Security Services Task Force under section 11; new text end new text begin (5) identify and explain the expenditures for legislative services unit implementation; and new text end new text begin (6) make recommendations on any relevant changes in state law, including proposed legislation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 3 PUBLIC SAFETY APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin PUBLIC SAFETYnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,314,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Office of Justice Programs new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 1,314,000 new text end new text begin (a) new text end new text begin Task Force on Improving Responses to Domestic Violence Crimes new text end new text begin $159,000 the second year is for the Task Force on Improving Responses to Domestic Violence Crimes. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) Trafficking and Sexual Exploitation Prevention for Youth new text end new text begin $125,000 the second year is for a grant to a nonprofit organization selected following a request for proposals to be used to address youth trafficking and sexual exploitation in the Twin Cities metropolitan area. The grant recipient must use the money to provide youth trafficking prevention services to youth, parents, and the community by working with youth groups, recovery support groups, domestic violence support groups, and the Ramsey County correctional facility to provide victim-centered and trauma-informed support, awareness, and education to prevent youth trafficking, sexual violence, and exploitation in Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (c) Young Adult Reentry Services new text end new text begin $125,000 the second year is for a grant to a nonprofit organization to do the following in Hennepin County: engage in community outreach, partnership development, mobile case management, family reunification, aftercare, job attainment, follow up, and housing placement when young adults, up to age 24, are released from juvenile detention or prison. The grant recipient must specifically seek to address the lack of resources for the large number of young adults reentering the community post-incarceration or post-detention. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (d) Minnesota Clearance Grant Program new text end new text begin $905,000 the second year is for the Minnesota clearance grant program. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin CORRECTIONSnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 13,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Incarceration and Prerelease Services new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 13,000 new text end new text begin The base for incarceration and prerelease services is increased by $48,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $63,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin MINNESOTA VICTIMS OF CRIME ACCOUNT; TRANSFER.new text end new text begin $12,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is transferred from the general fund to the Minnesota victims of crime account in the special revenue fund established under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.708. The base for this transfer is $148,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $0 beginning in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 5. Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 2, section 4, is amended to read: Sec. 4. PEACE OFFICER STANDARDS AND TRAINING (POST) BOARD $ deleted text begin 11,691,000 deleted text end new text begin 12,749,000 new text end $ deleted text begin 11,739,000 deleted text end new text begin 12,797,000 new text end (a) Peace Officer Training Reimbursements $2,949,000 each year is for reimbursements to local governments for peace officer training costs. (b) Philando Castile Memorial Training Fund deleted text begin $4,942,000deleted text end new text begin $6,000,000new text end each year is to support and strengthen law enforcement training and implement best practices. This funding shall be named the "Philando Castile Memorial Training Fund." These funds may only be used to reimburse costs related to training courses that qualify for reimbursement under Minnesota Statutes, sections 626.8452 (use of force), 626.8469 (training in crisis response, conflict management, and cultural diversity), and 626.8474 (autism training). Each sponsor of a training course is required to include the following in the sponsor's application for approval submitted to the board: course goals and objectives; a course outline including at a minimum a timeline and teaching hours for all courses; instructor qualifications; and a plan for learning assessments of the course and documenting the assessments to the board during review. Upon completion of each course, instructors must submit student evaluations of the instructor's teaching to the sponsor. The board shall keep records of the applications of all approved and denied courses. All continuing education courses shall be reviewed after the first year. The board must set a timetable for recurring review after the first year. For each review, the sponsor must submit its learning assessments to the board to show that the course is teaching the learning outcomes that were approved by the board. A list of licensees who successfully complete the course shall be maintained by the sponsor and transmitted to the board following the presentation of the course and the completed student evaluations of the instructors. Evaluations are available to chief law enforcement officers. The board shall establish a data retention schedule for the information collected in this section. Each year, if funds are available after reimbursing all eligible requests for courses approved by the board under this deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin paragraphnew text end , the board may use the funds to reimburse law enforcement agencies for other board-approved law enforcement training courses. new text begin Any unexpended balance of the appropriation in the first year does not cancel but is available in the second year. new text end The base for this activity is $878,000 beginning in fiscal year 2028 and thereafter. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 4 PUBLIC SAFETY POLICY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 8.16, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authority. new text begin (a) new text end The attorney general, or any deputy, assistant, or special assistant attorney general whom the attorney general authorizes in writing, has the authority in any county of the state to subpoena and require the production ofnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end any records ofnew text begin :new text end new text begin (i)new text end telephone companies, cellular phone companies, paging companies, subscribers of private computer networks including Internet service providers or computer bulletin board systemsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (ii)new text end electric companies, gas companies, new text begin and new text end water utilitiesdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (iii)new text end chemical suppliersdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (iv)new text end hotels and motelsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (v)new text end pawn shopsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (vi)new text end airlines, buses, taxis, and other entities engaged in the business of transporting peopledeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end and new text begin (vii)new text end freight companies, self-service storage facilities, warehousing companies, package delivery companies, and other entities engaged in the businesses of transport, storage, or deliverydeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, and other documents or records related to a law enforcement investigation where there is probable cause to believe a crime has been committed involving a financial crime or fraud, including but not limited to fraud involving state funded or administered programs or services as defined in section 299C.061, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), and insurance fraud in violation of section 609.611. Nothing in this clause limits the attorney general's authority under section 8.31 or under other law; new text end and new text begin (3)new text end records of the existence of safe deposit box account numbers and customer savings and checking account numbers maintained by financial institutions and safe deposit companies. new text begin (b)new text end Subpoenas may only be issued for records that are relevant to an ongoing legitimate law enforcement investigation. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 638.14, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Applicant appearance; third-party statements. (a) An applicant for clemency must appear before the commission either in person or through available forms of telecommunication. (b) The victim of an applicant's crime may appear and speak at the meeting or submit a written statement to the commission. The commission may treat a victim's written statement as confidential and not disclose the statement to the applicant or the public if there is or has been an order for protection, harassment restraining order, or other no-contact order prohibiting the applicant from contacting the victim.new text begin At the request of the victim, the commission may treat a victim's written statement as confidential and not disclose the statement to the public.new text end (c) A law enforcement agency's representative may provide the agency's position on whether the commission should recommend clemency by: (1) appearing and speaking at the meeting; or (2) submitting a written statement to the commission. (d) The sentencing judge and the prosecuting attorney, or their successors, may provide their positions on whether the commission should recommend clemency by: (1) appearing and speaking at the meeting; or (2) submitting their statements under section 638.11, subdivision 2. Sec. 3. new text begin TASK FORCE ON IMPROVING RESPONSES TO DOMESTIC VIOLENCE CRIMES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Task Force on Improving Responses to Domestic Violence Crimes is established to review law enforcement, prosecutorial, and community responses to domestic violence crimes and make policy and funding recommendations to the legislature to improve those responses and increase public safety. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety must invite individuals with lived domestic violence experience and representatives from city and county prosecuting agencies, Violence Free Minnesota, Mending the Sacred Hoop, other statewide crime victim coalitions, organizations that advocate for or provide direct services to victims of domestic violence, organizations that provide domestic abuse transformation programming, the Minnesota judicial branch, the Minnesota Board of Public Defense, the Minnesota Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers, the Department of Health, the Department of Public Safety, the Office of Justice Programs, the Office for Missing and Murdered Indigenous Relatives, the Office for Missing and Murdered Black Women and Girls, local law enforcement agencies, Tribal governments, and other interested parties to participate in the task force. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must ensure that the membership of the task force is balanced among the various representatives, reflects a broad spectrum of viewpoints, reflects the geographic diversity of the state, and is inclusive of marginalized communities as well as victim and survivor voices. new text end new text begin (c) Members serve at the pleasure of the commissioner of public safety or until the task force expires. The commissioner may fill vacancies consistent with the qualifications of the vacating member invited to participate in the task force. new text end new text begin (d) Members of the task force serve without compensation. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Officers; meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety or the commissioner's designee must convene the first meeting of the task force by September 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) At the first meeting, the members of the task force must elect a chair and may elect other officers as the members deem necessary. new text end new text begin (c) The task force must meet monthly or as determined by the chair. The task force must meet frequently enough to accomplish the tasks identified in this section. new text end new text begin (d) Meetings of the task force are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must review current practices related to cases of domestic violence and recommend policies, training, statutory changes, and funding to make investigations more effective, support and protect victims, improve prosecutions, and increase awareness of issues connected to domestic violence throughout the criminal justice system. new text end new text begin (b) The task force's first responsibility must be to develop a model policy on the use of lethality assessments by peace officers and recommend training for peace officers, law enforcement agencies, and others regarding the use of lethality assessments. The model policy must require peace officers interviewing a victim of domestic abuse to assess the potential danger to the victim and recommend specific actions for peace officers to take if the results of the assessment indicate the victim is in need of immediate protection or services. The model policy may include a lethality assessment form for use by peace officers. new text end new text begin (c) At a minimum, the task force must: new text end new text begin (1) review current training related to domestic violence cases that is provided to 911 telecommunicators, peace officers, social workers, prosecuting attorneys, and judges; new text end new text begin (2) develop updated training guidelines and establish recommendations for regular review of those guidelines; new text end new text begin (3) review current practices for interviewing victims of domestic violence, children who are victims or witnesses of domestic violence, and other witnesses; new text end new text begin (4) make recommendations for improved interviewing practices, including policies for following up on interviews and providing protection and support for witnesses; new text end new text begin (5) identify barriers victims of domestic violence encounter when reporting incidents of domestic violence, participating in an investigation or prosecution, and accessing services; new text end new text begin (6) recommend standard policies and practices to reduce the barriers victims of domestic violence encounter; new text end new text begin (7) identify crimes that frequently occur in conjunction with incidents of domestic violence, such as property damage and theft, and make recommendations regarding investigating, documenting, and prosecuting those offenses; new text end new text begin (8) identify conditions, such as traumatic brain injuries, that frequently result from repeated incidents of domestic violence and recommend policies and procedures for working with victims and witnesses who may be suffering from those conditions; new text end new text begin (9) make recommendations for public awareness campaigns to improve the ability of the general public to identify signs of domestic violence and properly report observations; new text end new text begin (10) review practices in Minnesota and other jurisdictions regarding the use of specialty courts or dedicated calendars to address cases involving domestic violence and family law to determine if dedicated courts improve outcomes for victims, reduce recidivism, increase consistency, or have any other benefits; new text end new text begin (11) review current practices related to the involvement of victim advocates; new text end new text begin (12) make recommendations for best practices related to supporting victims of domestic violence through the use of victim advocates, including identifying the appropriate scope of services, recommending the point of initial engagement, suggesting the appropriate frequency of contacts, and making other recommendations related to improving the quality and consistency of contacts; new text end new text begin (13) review prosecutorial policies adopted under Minnesota Statutes, section 611A.0311, and make recommendations for updates to those policies; new text end new text begin (14) identify appropriate data that prosecutors should collect and report related to cases involving domestic violence to ensure consistency and transparency in the prosecution of cases involving domestic violence and the appropriate protection and support of victims and witnesses; new text end new text begin (15) review existing data to assess the regularity of cases in which multiple parties are arrested following an incident of domestic violence and make recommendations related to whether arrests should be limited to the predominant aggressor; and new text end new text begin (16) evaluate public health policies to encourage the prevention of domestic violence. new text end new text begin (d) The task force may consider additional information, request presentations or contributions from any other organization or person, and consider other issues consistent with the purpose of the task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin (a) By January 15, 2027, the task force must submit a preliminary report to the chairs, cochairs, and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety that includes the model policy and recommendations for the training described in subdivision 4, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) By January 15, 2028, the task force must submit a final report to the chairs, cochairs, and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety on the work of the task force, including any recommendations for legislation or funding. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires the day after submitting its final report under subdivision 5. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin MINNESOTA CLEARANCE GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "nonfatal shooting clearance rate" means the rate at which a law enforcement agency cleared by arrest or cleared by exceptional means a nonfatal shooting offense. For purposes of this definition: new text end new text begin (1) "cleared by arrest" means that a law enforcement agency has arrested at least one person as an offender, charged the person with the commission of an offense, and referred the person to the court for prosecution; and new text end new text begin (2) "cleared by exceptional means" means that a law enforcement agency has identified at least one person as an offender; gathered enough evidence to support an arrest, charge the person, and refer the person to the court for prosecution; identified the person's exact location for the person to be taken into custody immediately; and encountered a circumstance outside the control of the law enforcement agency that prohibits the agency from arresting, charging, and referring the person for prosecution. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program establishment; purpose. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety must establish the Minnesota clearance grant program to award grants to law enforcement agencies to reduce violent crime by increasing the solve rate of crimes that involve the nonfatal shooting of a firearm. The purpose of the program is to improve law enforcement strategies and initiatives aimed at increasing nonfatal shooting clearance rates, engagement, and support for victims of violent crime. The program recognizes that nonfatal shooting offenses often involve multiple jurisdictions and encourages interagency cooperative efforts to maximize information sharing, resource sharing, and expertise. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application; grant awards. new text end new text begin (a) Applicants must submit an application in the form and manner established by the commissioner. In awarding a grant, the commissioner must give priority to a law enforcement agency: new text end new text begin (1) that develops a plan to partner with other law enforcement agencies to maximize interagency information sharing, resource sharing, and expertise; new text end new text begin (2) that demonstrates a commitment to working with other government agencies to improve clearance rates; and new text end new text begin (3) that details a process for evaluating the effectiveness of both investigators and investigative units, including but not limited to the development of specific goals and performance metrics. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must distribute 50 percent of the funding appropriated for grants under this section to applicants from outside the metropolitan area, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (c) Distribution of state money or technical assistance are by contractual arrangement between the commissioner and each recipient law enforcement agency. Terms of the contract are negotiable each year. The state auditor must periodically audit all law enforcement agencies receiving state grants. Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement agency from receiving federal or local grants if grants become available. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Use of grants. new text end new text begin A law enforcement agency awarded a grant under this section must use the grant award: new text end new text begin (1) to improve investigatory resources, including but not limited to the hiring of personnel assigned to investigate nonfatal shooting crimes or collect, process, and test forensic evidence; new text end new text begin (2) for overtime for investigators and support staff; new text end new text begin (3) to develop evidence-based policies, procedures, and training; new text end new text begin (4) for technical assistance; new text end new text begin (5) for law enforcement equipment or technology, including but not limited to investigative, evidence-processing, or forensic-testing equipment or technology; new text end new text begin (6) for information systems, with prioritization for projects that would improve data integration and the ability to share information across and between law enforcement agencies, prosecuting attorneys' offices, and crime laboratories; new text end new text begin (7) for hiring and retention of victim-witness coordinators; and new text end new text begin (8) to partner with hospital-based violence intervention programs. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin A law enforcement agency that receives a grant under this section must submit biannually to the commissioner a report on activities carried out to reduce violent crime and improve nonfatal shooting clearance rates during the preceding fiscal year, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) the number of investigations initiated, the number of nonfatal shootings cleared, the demographics of victims and offenders, and the impact on the nonfatal shooting clearance rates in the jurisdiction where investigations were initiated; new text end new text begin (2) the number of personnel hired or assigned to investigate nonfatal shootings, disaggregated between sworn law enforcement officers and civilian or unsworn professional staff; new text end new text begin (3) the number of personnel hired or assigned to collect, process, and test forensic evidence; new text end new text begin (4) the number of personnel hired or assigned to provide victim services; new text end new text begin (5) the description of any training developed or implemented; new text end new text begin (6) the description of any new technology purchased or acquired; new text end new text begin (7) how grant-funded activities have impacted clearance rates; and new text end new text begin (8) the record management system, or equivalent, used to collect case information and the system's ability to integrate with the record management systems of other agencies, prosecuting attorney's offices, and crime laboratories. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Article 3, section 1, of 2026 S.F. No. 4760, if enacted, is repealed. new text end ARTICLE 5 GENERAL CRIMINAL PROVISIONS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 609.2231, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Firefighters and deleted text begin emergencydeleted text end medical personnel. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), whoever physically assaults any of the following persons is guilty of a gross misdemeanor: (1) either: (i) a member of a municipal or volunteer fire department in the performance of the member's duties; or (ii) a member of an emergency medical services personnel unit in the performance of the member's duties; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2) a physician, nurse, or other person providing health care services in a hospital emergency departmentdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (3) a security guard, as defined in section 326.32, subdivision 13, providing services in a hospital or clinic. new text end (b) Whoever physically assaults a person described in paragraph (a), is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than three years or to payment of a fine of not more than $6,000, or both, if the assault inflicts demonstrable bodily harm. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.52, subdivision 3a, is amended to read: Subd. 3a. Enhanced deleted text begin penaltydeleted text end new text begin penalties; risk of harm; vulnerable adultnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end If a violation of this section creates a reasonably foreseeable risk of bodily harm to another, the penalties described in subdivision 3 are enhanced as follows: (1) if the penalty is a misdemeanor or a gross misdemeanor, the person is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than three years or to payment of a fine of not more than $5,000, or both; and (2) if the penalty is a felony, the statutory maximum sentence for the offense is 50 percent longer than for the underlying crime. new text begin (b) If a person violates this section knowing or having reason to know that the victim of the offense is a vulnerable adult as defined in section 609.232, subdivision 11, the penalties described in subdivision 3 are enhanced as follows: new text end new text begin (1) if the penalty is a misdemeanor, the person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor; new text end new text begin (2) if the penalty is a gross misdemeanor, the person is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $5,000, or both; and new text end new text begin (3) if the penalty is a felony, the statutory maximum sentence for the offense is 25 percent longer than for the underlying crime. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 617.246, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Venue. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in section 627.01, an offense committed under this section may be prosecuted in: new text end new text begin (1) the county where the offense occurred; new text end new text begin (2) the county of residence of the accused or victim; or new text end new text begin (3) if venue cannot be located in the counties specified under clause (1) or (2), the county where any sexual performance or child sexual abuse material is produced, reproduced, found, stored, received, promoted, disseminated, or possessed in violation of this section. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 617.247, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Venue. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in section 627.01, an offense committed under this section may be prosecuted in: new text end new text begin (1) the county where the offense occurred; new text end new text begin (2) the county of residence of the accused or victim; or new text end new text begin (3) if venue cannot be located in the counties specified under clause (1) or (2), the county where any sexual performance or child sexual abuse material is produced, reproduced, found, stored, received, promoted, disseminated, or possessed in violation of this section. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [617.275] CHILD SEXUAL ABUSE MATERIAL; ON-SCENE DIGITAL EVIDENCE PREVIEW. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Authority. new text end new text begin When a court issues a search warrant authorizing the search and seizure of electronic devices or digital media for evidence of child sexual abuse material, the warrant also authorizes law enforcement officers and forensic investigators to conduct an on-scene forensic preview of the device or media at the location of execution. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Preview. new text end new text begin The on-scene forensic preview of an electronic device or digital media is limited to the examination reasonably necessary to identify, confirm, and document the presence or absence of child sexual abuse material, as defined in section 617.246, subdivision 1, paragraph (f). Any additional forensic analysis of a device or media beyond the initial preview must be conducted in a digital forensic laboratory or other controlled environment pursuant to a separate court-issued search warrant specific to that device or media. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Safeguards. new text end new text begin (a) On-scene forensic previews must be conducted using forensic methods designed to preserve the integrity of data and ensure admissibility in court. new text end new text begin (b) If a preview establishes that a seized device contains no relevant evidence, law enforcement shall return the device to the owner or possessor as soon as practicable, consistent with section 626.04. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Warrant. new text end new text begin A separate search warrant is not required for the limited on-scene forensic preview authorized under this section, provided that the underlying warrant expressly authorizes the search for child sexual abuse material. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section diminishes or alters the constitutional protections afforded under the Fourth Amendment of the United States Constitution, or Minnesota Constitution, article I, section 10. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to search warrants issued on or after that date. new text end ARTICLE 6 PREDICTION MARKETS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299L.03, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Cease and desist orders. (a) When it appears to the director that any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of this chapter, deleted text begin ordeleted text end any rule or order issued under this chapter, new text begin or section 609.7615, new text end the director may issue and cause to be served on the person an order requiring the person to cease and desist from new text begin the new text end violations deleted text begin of this chapter, or any rule or order issued under this chapterdeleted text end . The order must give reasonable notice of the rights of the person to request a hearing and must state the reason for the entry of the order. Unless otherwise agreed between the parties, a hearing must be held not later than seven days after receiving the request for a hearing. Within 20 days of receiving the administrative law judge's report and subsequent exceptions and argument, the director shall issue an order vacating the cease and desist order, modifying the order, or making it permanent, as the facts require. If no hearing is requested within 30 days of service of the order, the order becomes final and remains in effect until modified or vacated by the commissioner. All hearings under this subdivision must be conducted in accordance with sections 14.57 to 14.69 of the Administrative Procedure Act. If the person to whom a cease and desist order has been issued under this subdivision fails to appear at a hearing after being notified of the hearing, the person is deemed in default and the proceeding may be determined against the person on consideration of the cease and desist order, the allegations of which are deemed to be true. (b) When it appears to the director that any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of this chapter, deleted text begin ordeleted text end any rule adopted or subpoena or order issued under this chapter, new text begin or section 609.7615, new text end the director may bring an action in the district court in the appropriate county to enjoin the acts or practices and to enforce compliance deleted text begin with this chapter or any rule, subpoena, or order issued or adopted under this chapterdeleted text end , and may refer the matter to the attorney general. On a proper showing, the court shall grant a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandamus. The court may not require the director to post a bond. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.75, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. What are not bets. The following are not bets: (1) a contract to insure, indemnify, guarantee or otherwise compensate another for a harm or loss sustained, even though the loss depends upon chance; (2) a contract for the purchase or sale deleted text begin at adeleted text end new text begin fornew text end future deleted text begin datedeleted text end new text begin deliverynew text end of securities or deleted text begin otherdeleted text end new text begin any physicalnew text end commoditiesnew text begin or any option on such futures contract, such securities or commodities, or on the prices thereof, except as provided in section 609.7615new text end ; (3) offers of purses, prizes or premiums to the actual contestants in any bona fide contest for the determination of skill, speed, strength, endurance, or quality or to the bona fide owners of animals or other property entered in such a contest; (4) the game of bingo when conducted in compliance with sections 349.11 to 349.23; (5) a private social bet not part of or incidental to organized, commercialized, or systematic gambling; (6) the operation of equipment or the conduct of a raffle under sections 349.11 to 349.22, by an organization licensed by the Gambling Control Board or an organization exempt from licensing under section 349.166; (7) pari-mutuel betting on horse racing when the betting is conducted under chapter 240; and (8) the purchase and sale of State Lottery tickets under chapter 349A. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [609.7615] PREDICTION MARKETS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Athletic event" means a sports game, match, or activity, or series of games, matches, activities, or tournaments involving the physical proficiency of one or more players or participants. Athletic event includes horse racing as defined in section 240.01, subdivision 8. new text end new text begin (c) "Esports event" means a competition between individuals or teams using video games in a game, match, contest, or series of games, matches, or contests, or a tournament, or by a person or team against a specified measure of performance which is hosted at a physical location or online. new text end new text begin (d) "Game of skill" means a game, match, or tournament, or a series of games, matches, and tournaments involving the dexterity or mental skill of one or more players or participants. Game of skill includes an esports event. new text end new text begin (e) "Prediction market" means a system that allows consumers to place a wager on the future outcome of a specified event that is not determined or affected by the performance of the parties to the contract for: new text end new text begin (1) an athletic event or game of skill, or portions thereof or individual performance statistics therein; new text end new text begin (2) any game played with cards, dice, equipment, or any mechanical or electronic device or machine; new text end new text begin (3) war, state or national emergencies, human-made disasters, mass shootings, acts of terrorism, or public health crises, or the ancillary effects thereof; new text end new text begin (4) any event or events happening to a natural person or group of people; new text end new text begin (5) a federal, state, or local election, or the specific decisions of the federal, state, or local government and the government's agencies, employees, and officers, the primary underlying characteristic of which is not financial, commercial, or economic or the outcome is under the complete control of any person or the outcome is known by any person in advance. This prohibition applies to event contracts on the specific action or decision itself and does not apply to the resulting consequences of such actions or decisions; new text end new text begin (6) legal actions, including but not limited to a civil or criminal suit, grand jury action, jury trial, settlement, plea, or conviction; new text end new text begin (7) the death, assassination, or attempted killing of a person or group of persons, or mass casualty events; new text end new text begin (8) events in popular culture, including but not limited to awards and the date a piece of entertainment will be released; or new text end new text begin (9) whether a person will make a particular statement. new text end new text begin (f) "Wager" means a contract, including a prediction market contract, whereby the parties to the contract agree to a gain or loss by one to the other of money, property, or benefit. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prediction markets; hosting prohibited. new text end new text begin A person is guilty of a felony if the person, for consideration and as part of a business: new text end new text begin (1) creates a prediction market; new text end new text begin (2) operates, manages, or controls a platform or system intending that consumers will use the platform or system to make wagers in a prediction market; new text end new text begin (3) intentionally facilitates the operation of a prediction market by: new text end new text begin (i) identifying or listing events knowing the events will be used by consumers to make wagers; new text end new text begin (ii) accepting, holding, or directing the disposition of funds or other things of value for the purpose of allowing consumers to make wagers or to settle wagers made by consumers; new text end new text begin (iii) determining, administering, or enforcing the terms, pricing, or settlement of wagers made by consumers; new text end new text begin (iv) regularly or continuously acting as a counterparty to wagers made by consumers by entering into a wager, offering to enter into a wager, or taking a temporary position in a wager that may be replaced by a different consumer; or new text end new text begin (v) setting or adjusting the prices, odds, or terms that apply to wagers entered into by consumers; new text end new text begin (4) provides data, information, or verification services, including the provision of event outcomes, directly to a prediction market knowing that the data, information, or verification services will be used to allow consumers to make wagers or to settle wagers made by consumers in violation of this section; or new text end new text begin (5) provides supportive services to a prediction market knowing that the services will be used to identify a consumer's location, transfer funds, or make or process payments for the purpose of allowing consumers to make wagers or to settle wagers made by consumers in violation of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Prediction markets; advertising prohibited. new text end new text begin Whoever advertises or markets financial or technological products that promote transactions prohibited under this section is guilty of a felony. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin Subdivision 2 does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) activities that are not bets under section 609.75, subdivision 3; and new text end new text begin (2) contracts authorized and regulated under chapters 59A to 79A. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin 2026 S.F. No. 4760, article 8, sections 1, 2, and 3, if enacted, are repealed. new text end